Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF815.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1966YH (1) 91 lh/ko H.F. 815 Section 1. MEDICAID PROVIDER REIMBURSEMENT RATES ââ ANNUAL 1 AUTOMATIC INCREASES. Notwithstanding any provision of law 2 to the contrary regarding inflation factors or indexing of 3 Medicaid provider reimbursement rates, and in addition to any 4 other change in reimbursement rates specified for a fiscal 5 year, the department of health and human services shall 6 automatically increase the reimbursement rate of a provider 7 enrolled in the Medicaid program on July 1, annually, by 8 applying a two and one-half percent increase to the specific 9 providerâs current reimbursement rate. 10